Mississippi, session 2026, HB1745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER), with funds specifically appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose, shall contract  with a certified public accounting firm to perform an audit that shall cover the five (5) previous fiscal years for the Inmate Welfare Fund, the state's health contract for prison medical services provided for state inmates and MagCor, which operates what is formerly known as Mississippi Prison Industries. The audit shall be delivered to the Legislature at its conclusion. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.